Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1523
Program; administration.

(1) The department, through the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program, shall coordinate the establishment of community lifespan respite services programs. The program shall accept proposals submitted in the form and manner required by the program from community-based private nonprofit or for-profit agencies or public agencies that provide respite services to operate community lifespan respite services programs. According to criteria established by the department, the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program shall designate and fund agencies described in this section to operate community lifespan respite services programs.

(2) The department shall create the position of program specialist for the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program to administer the program.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 76;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 290.